Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5411YH (3) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2264 Section 1. MEDICAID PROGRAM ââ HOME HEALTH AIDES ââ 1 MINIMUM HOURLY WAGE. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the department of health and 3 human services shall continue to base home health agency 4 reimbursement rates on the Medicare low utilization payment 5 adjustment (LUPA) methodology with state geographic wage 6 adjustments, but shall adjust the labor portion and the 7 adjusted wage rate of the LUPA methodology to provide a minimum 8 per hour wage of fifteen dollars and twenty cents for home 9 health aides. 10 Sec. 2. MEDICAID PROGRAM ââ HOME HEALTH AIDES MINIMUM 11 HOURLY WAGE ââ APPROPRIATION. There is appropriated from the 12 general fund of the state to the department of health and human 13 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 14 June 30, 2027, a sufficient amount to provide reimbursement 15 under the Medicaid program to home health aides providing home 16 health program services and home and community-based services 17 waiver services at a minimum per hour wage of fifteen dollars 18 and twenty cents as provided in this Act. 19